src/czhyphen1-patched.pat
3¹uk
3¹um
3¹us
¹ú2t
¹2v
1¹vì
1¹vé
1¹vr
1¹vý
¹1zì
1ta.
3taat
3tabe
ta3d
3tado
3tadr
1taj
3tajo
3takis
ta3kl
ta3kr
3talg
3talr
3tamb
t3andc
3tanì
3tan¹
t3ao
3tapán
t3apor
3taps
ta3str
ta3¹p
tat3øe
tau3c
t3aup
tav3¹t
3tax
1tá.
1tád
tá3d¾
3tána
tá3sl
2t1b
t3ba
t3bl
t3by
2tc
t1cb
t1cd
t1cg
t3chc
t3chf
t3chh
tch3it
t1cj
t1cm
t3cp
t1cr
t1cs
tc1t
t1cu
t1cy
t1cz
t2èa
t2èá
t2èe
t3èi
tèit3
2t2èí
1tèt
t2èu
t1d
t2db
t2dd
tde3f
td3is.
td3l
t2dp1
t2dr
tds3t
t2dt
t2d2v
1te
3te.
te3ad
te3au
te3bb
te3br
te3et
te3ia
te3ib
te3ic
te3id
te3ig
te3il
te3io
te3is
te3it
te3ix
te3iz
teju3
tek3ho
te3ku
te3ký
tep3l
ter3ag
te3sb
te3sc
tes3ta
te3tè
t3etg
t3etie
tet3ø
tets3c
te3ue
te3vk
t3expr
1tì.
1tìc
1tìè
1tìd
tì3dl
2tìh
1tìm
2tìp
1tìø
tì3str
tì3stv
3tìtì
1té
3tém
1të
2tf
t2fg
t2fr
2tg
t2gb
th3apo
t3hav
th3bur
3theai
3thec
th3id.
th3ja
th1p
th3tv
t3hud
1ti
ti3bb
ti3bl
ticko3
tiè3t
ti3egf
2tih
ti3kl
tin3he
tirs3c
tis3id
ti3sl
tiú1
1tíc
1tíj
1tím
1tíò
tí3plá
tí3plé
tí3plý
1tís
1tíz
1tí¾
2tjá
t2je
t3jul
t3j3us
2t1k2
t3kaj
t3kav
t2kl
t3kov
t3kù.
3t2kv
3tl.
t3lau
2tlá
t3lás
2tlb
t3lc
t1le
tle3h
tles3
t1lì
2t1lé
2tli
t3lim
t3lin
2tlí
t3lík
t3líø
2tlk
2tll
t3lla
3tlm
t3lo.
t3loi
t3lon
tlono3
t3lop
2tlö
tlu3c
tlu3è
tlu3j
tlu3k
tl3ul
tlu3m
tlu3p
tlu3¹
2tly
2t1lý
t3mari
t3marn
2tmá
t1mé
2tmg
2tmi
t3mi.
t3mich
2tmo
2tmt
2t1n
t2nd
3tnf
t2ng
t3ní
t3nk
t1ò
3t2òa
1to
to3b
t3obj
tob3re
to3dr
t3ofh
to1i
2toj
to3jmo
to3mm
to3m¾
top3up
to3sb
to3sk.
to3ska
to3sko
to3skv
to3sky
to3¹ka
to3¹ká
to3¹ke
to3¹kù
to3¾p
1tó
1tö.
2t1p
t3patn
t3pá
t2pb
tpe3x
t3pi
t3pl
t2pp
1tq
t3raki
t3rau.
3trav
t3ravá
t3ravì
t3ravs
t3ráj
1trc
tr3cl
t3rev.
t2rh
t3rhi
3trif
3tril
tri3sl
1trí
t3rj
trl3a
t1ro
t3rol
3troú
t3rows
3t3ro¾
3t3rów
t2rp
tr1t
tru3sp
3truv
t3rùm
3t3rùv
1trv
t3rvo
t3rvu
t3rvy
3trym
2trý
trz2
1tr¾
3tøáb
1tøc
t3øil
t3øit
t3øíè
2tøk
1tøm
2tøn
tø1t
t1øu
2t1s
t2sè
t3sé
t2sf
ts3hd
t3sl
t2sn
t2ss
ts3sa
ts2t
ts3ve
t1¹
t¹2c
2t¹í
t2¹k
t2¹l
t2¹n
t3¹t
t¹3tì
t2¹»
2tt
t1ta
t3tah
t1tä
t3tá
t1td
t1tì
tt3ho
tti3f
t3tí.
t1tr
t3tøic
t1tu
t1tú
t1tv
t1tw
t1tx
t1ty
t1»
t2u
1tu.
tu1a
1tuá
tu1e
tu3hr
tu1i
1tuj
3tukù
3tuli
t3upg
tu3ry
3tusk
tus3q
3tuta
1tù
2tùj
t2úb
t2úe
tú2n
tú2t
t2v
2tve
2t3vé
t3vi
t3vící
t3vový
tv3tu
t3vým
t3wash
t3wev
t1xh
1ty.
tyb3l
tyd3l
ty3ei
ty3ml
ty3mr
ty3¹k
ty3tr
1tý
2týv
2týý
tz2d
t1zì
t1zg
t1z2h
t1z2j
t1z2m
tz2n
tz2p
tz3pl
t1zr
tz3rie
tz2ú
t1z2v
t3zy
t1¾
»ah2
1»al
»a3stv
»áè2
»1c
1»f
»i1è
»in3
»2j
2»1k
2»1m
»2mì
»1n
1»o
»o3¹ka
»1p
»1si
2»1t
»u1c
2»ug
»u2t
u1ac
u1aè
u1aí
u1aj
u1al
u1aq
u1a¹
u2at
u1au1
u1á
u1ba
u3be
u3bi
ub3lík
ub3lý
u3bo
ub3obj
u3bu
u1bù
u1cè
u1cd
u1cé
u1cf
u3chc
u3chd
u3che
u3chf
u3chi
u3chí
u3chk
u3chp
u3chù
u3chw
u3chz
u1cj
u1c1m
uc3of
u1cp
uc3pr
2u1cr
u1cs
u1cu
u1cy
u1cz2
uè1b
u1èh
u1èl
u2è1m
u2è3t
u2èù
u2da
ud3be
2udg
ud3la
ud3lou
2udo
ud3re
u3dru
ud3øí
u3du
u2dý
u2ï
ue1a
ue3br
ue3ch
u1eè
u1ed
u1eg
ue1i
u1ej
u1ek
u1eò
ue3sb
ue3sc
ues3l
u1e¹
ue3u
u1ev
u1éa
u1éd
u1él
2uf
u2fr
u2fø
u3gl
u2gn
ug3v
u1ha
u1há
u1hb
uh3dr
u1he
3uher¹
u1hì
u1hé
u1hf
u1hi
u1hí
u3hla
uh3lác
uh3lák
uh3lám
uh3lán
uh3láø
uh3lel
uh3lo
u3hls
u1hm
u2hn
u1ho
u1hp
u1hø
u1hs
uhs3i
u1h¹
u1hu
u1hù
u1hú
u3hvì
u1hw
u1hy
u1hý
u1h¾
ui1b
u1iè
u1ih
u1ii
uis3t
u1i¹
u1iy
u1iz
u1i¾
u1í
u1j
u2jm
u2jp
uj3us
u2jv
u3ka.
u1ke
uk3ene
uk3la
uk3le
uk2m
u1ko
uko3sc
1ukö
uk3ra.
uk3rb
uk3rf
uk3rù
uk3te
u1ku
u1ky
u1la
u1lá
u1le
ule3b
u1lé
ul1h
uli3sl
u1lí
u1lo
u1ló
u1lq
u1lr
ul3t3l
u1lu
u1lú
u1lw
u1lx
u1lý
u1ma
u1má
1umø
unen3a
u2né
ung3è
ung3j
ung3wu
un3hab
un3up
u2ný
u2òu
u1o
uo1i
uo3sk
u1ó
u3pa
u1pá
u1pe
uper3
u1pì
u1pi
u1pí
u3pln
u2pn
u1pù
u1py
u1q
u1ra
ura3sp
u1rá
1urè
u3re
u2rg
u1ri
urm3ex
u3ro
1uró
ur3rev
ur3sl
u1ru
2u1rù
2ury
u1ø
uøis3
uø1t
us3asc
us3avi
us3deu
us3di
us3hei
us3ká
us3kej
us3ké
us3ko
us3ky
us3ký
us3lan
us3lá
us3le
us3lé
us3lý
us3om
us3pet
u2sr
us3son
us3tì
u3stø
u3ství
u3su.
us3za
u1¹á
u¹2l
u¹3lá.
u2¹p
u¹1t
u1t
2ut.
ut3b
u3tbi
ut3chi
ut3chm
ut3chù
ut3hai
ut3ju
u2tl
ut3lí
u2tm
uto3¹
uto3un
uts2
uts3d
u2t¹
ut3th
u1»
u1u
u2ud
uu1i
uu3ka
u3ut
uuu1
uu2v
u1ù
uú2
u2vd
u3vi
uv3ind
u3vs
u2v¹
u2vù
uvý1
uv3zá
u1w
u1x
ux3ar
u1y
uy1t
u2za
u2zá
uz3dé
u1zf
uz2h
uz3ka
uz1l
uz2m
uz3me
u1zó
uz3tm
u2zù
uz2v
uz3zm
u1¾á
u2¾é
ù1b
ù1c
ù2è2t
ù2e
ù2fa
ù2fì
ù2fu
ù2fy
ù1hl
ù1hm
ù1hy1
ù1jd
ù1k
ùk2l
ù1la
ù1le
ù2lì
ùl1h
ùlob3
ù2ly
ù1m
ù3mc
ù3ms
ù2mù
ù2m2¾
ù1òá
ù1òc
ùo1
ù1p
ù1ra
ù3res
ù3rev
ù1ru
ù2rù
ù1rv
ù1ry
ù2øi
ù2øí
ù1sa
ù1sb
ù1sm
ù1sp
ùs3tán
ù1¹a
ù2¹í
ù2¹1k
ù1¹ù
ù1¹v
ù1ta
ùt2c
ù1tì
ù3tkl
ù1tl
ùt2r
ù1ty
ù1»
ù2vá
ù2ve
ù2vi
ù2vj
ù2v1t
ù2vu
ù2vy
ù2za
ù2zá
ù2ze
ù2zi
ù2zí
ùz3ka
ùzné3
ù1zv
ù2zý
ù2¾í
ù2¾u
1ú
úa2c
ú3bì.
úbi3s
ú1by
ú2c2
úè2
úè3k
ú2èo
ú3ès
ú2d
ú1ï
úe1
ú1es
ú1et
úh3lel
úh3lí
úh3lo
ú1ho
úir1
új1c
ú2je
új2m
új1o
úk2
ú1ká
ú2ky
ú2l
ú1ma
úm2c
ú1my
ún2
ú2ne
ú2nì
2ú2nù
2úny
2ú2pu
ú1ru
ú1ry
2úøi
ú2sá
ú1si
ú1sm
úso1
ús1s
ús3tì
ú1sú
ú2sv
ú2sy
ú1¹
ú2¹»
ú2ta
út1è
ú2te
ú2tì
ú2ti
ú2tù
ú2ty
ú1»
ú2v2
ú2z
úz1k
ú3zy
ü3che
ü2gn
ü1kl
ü1ku
ü1la
ül2s
ü1np
ü1nw
ü1pa
ü1pe
ü1pf
ü1ru
üs3c
ü1z
1v
va3dl
v3aid
vaj3c
va3jg
va3kr
van3ae
vans3p
3vanù
va3stø
vat3ø
va3urs
v3aus
vá3dr
vád3re
vá3d¾
vá3ri
vá3sle
vá3tr
vá1w
2v1b
v3bh
v3bv
2v1c
v3ca
vc3in
v3cp
v3cs
3v2ct
2vè
v2èa
v2èi
v2èo
vè2t
v2èu1
v3dam
3vdan
vd3au
2vdc
2v3di
v1dl
vdm2
vd3ra
2vds
v2dý
ve1a
ve3br
ve3dle
ve3et
2veé
ve1i
ve3jd
ve3ku
ve3ml
vep3ø
ver3k
ver3up
ve3sci
ves3l
ve3sta
ve3tí
ve3tø
ve1u
ve3ya.
vez3m
ve3zpr
ve3zr
vì1b
vì3dø
vì3hn
vì3hr
vì3mì
vì1o
vì3ta
vé3lu
vé3mì
2véø
vé3sa
vé3¹
v2fr
v2gn
vgu1
v3gw
3vib
3vide
vi3hd
vi3pl
3vín
ví¹3k
v2j
v3jz
2v1k
vk2l
vk2m
v3kov
vk3pr
v2kr
v3kù
v2kv
v2l
2vlo
vlo3s
2vlý
2v1m
vma3ii
v2mì
v2mh
v2mm
vm2n
2v1n
vni3s
2v1ò
v2òa
vo3b
vob3l
vodu3s
v3oft
vo3id
vo3in
vo2s
vo3¹ka
vo3¹kl
vota3
vot3c
vou3
vové3
v3ovse
voz3ke
vó1r
v1pl
v1pø
v2pu
vra3st
v1ré
v3rib
3vrnì
3vrnil
3vrní
3vrnn
v1ro
vrt3h
vrùs3
v1rý
v2ø
v3øit
v3øín
2v1s2
v2sa
v3sate
v2sá
v2sb
v2sc
3vset
v2sh
vsis3
vs3kov
vs3le
v2sm
v2sn
v2sp
v2ss
v2sv
v2sy
v2sz
v¹2
v2¹a
v2¹á
v2¹è
v2¹e
v¹e3s
v2¹i
v2¹í
v2¹k
v¹3ka
v2¹m
v3¹tí.
2vt.
2vtc
v1tè
2vte
v2tì
v2ti
2vtu
2v2ty
v2tý
vu1a
vu1c
vu1e
vu1h
vu1i
vu3pl
vuse3
vú2è
vú2n
vv1a
v2v1t
v2x
vy1
vy3c2
vy3è2
vy3d
vy3j
vy3km
vy3li
vy3m
vy3n
3vy3p2
vy3r
vy3ø2
3vys2
3vy3t
vyz2
vý3t
vý1ý
v2z2
v2¾2
v3¾i
1wah
wa3jg
3war
3wasp
3wata
wby2
w1è
w1db
we2
wej1
wf1s
wgo1
w1hf
wi3fr
wih2
wilo3
win3wi
wis3sh
w2je
wj1o
wj1u
w1k
wk2c
wkr3u
wks2
2wl.
w3lev
wl3h
2wls
2wlu
w2ly
w1m
w2mg
w2mh
w2ml
w2mm
w2mw
w1nh
w1nm
w1np
w1nr
w1nw
w1nx
wob3l
wo3mm
3woog
wo3wa
w1p
wp3in
w2pp
w3rev
w2sá
w1si
ws3l
w3strá
w2sv
w2sy
wt3ch
wt3zbo
1wu1a
wu1e
wu3kc
wu2n
w1up
wu3si
wz1p
w1zv
w1¾
1xaè
xa3kr
3xan
x3aut
x1ch
x2du
xd2v
xe1e
1xei
1xej
xe1k
xel3ha
x3enp
1xey
2xf
x3hel
1xho
1xi1b
1xic
xi3cd
1xid
1xif
1xig
1xih
1xij
1xik
1xip
1xir
1xi¹
1xiv
x1k
xl3at
x3les
x3lev
x1lí
x2ly
x1m
xme1
xmet3
x2ml
2x1n
x3nc
x3off
xo1i
1xok
xoo2
1xov
x1p
3xrim
x3rr
x3sdr
x1si
3xstr
xsu2
x2sy
x1¹
x1t
xt3ali
xt3app
2xté
xt3ind
x2t1l
2x2tm
x2tø
xtto3
xty1
x1»
1xu
xu1a
xu2d
xu1e
x1uk
x2x
xx1q
xy1b
1xyh
xz2
x1zé
x1zó
x3¾
yab2
y2ah
y2ak
ya3kr
y2at
y1ä
y1á
y1ba
y1bb
y1bd
y3be
y1bì
y1bj
ybl2
yb3lík
y1bm
y1bö
y3br.
y3brá
y3bre
yb3ri
y3brn
y3bru
y3bry
y1bø
y1bu
y1bù
y1by
y1bý
y1cd
y1cé
y1cg
y3che
ych3ra
ych3ru
ych3ry
ych3s
y1cj
y1cm
y1cr
y1cu
y1cy
y1cz
yèis3
y1èl
y1db
ydek3
2y1dé
y1dg
yd3le
yd3lov
2ydn
yd3rea
y1dø
y1dt
y1d2v
y1d2z
y1d¾
y1ïm
ye3ay
ye1b
ye1i
y3env
ye3tc
ye3u3
y1ém
y1én
y3éres
y3fé
yg3lí
y2gn
y2gø
ygu1
y2gw
y1h2
yhi2
yh3li
yh3ly
y1i
yin3y
y1í
y1j
y3je
yj2m
y1ka
y1ká
y1kd
y1ke
y1ké
y1kh
y1ki
y1kj
y3kl.
yk3la
yk2m
y1kò
y1ko
ykos3t
y1kó
y1kr
y1k¹
y3kte
y1ku
y1kú
y1kw
y1ky
yk3yj
y1ký
y1l
y3le
yle3b
ylg2
y2lj
yl3lk
y3ly
y1ma
ymas3
y1mä
y1má
y1mì
y1mé
y1mí
y3ml.
y3mlo
y1mm
y1mó
y1my
y1nä
ync3s
y1nh
ynk2
y1nm
y1np
y1nq
y1n»
y1nw
y1nx
y2òu
y1o
yob1
y3oc2
y3of
y3og
yo1i1
yo1m
yon3w
y3oo
y3os
y3ot
y3ou
y3ow
y1ó
y1ö
y1p
ypá3t
yp2d
y3po
y2pp
y2pø
yp3øa
yp3øe
y1q
y1r
yrej3
y2rm
y2ró
yr2v
y2rz
y1øa
yø1b
y1øi
y1øí
yøk2
y2øo
yø3tu
y1øu
y1ø¾
y1sa
ys3ce
ys3è
y1si
ys3km
ys3kov
ys3lu
y1sm
y2sn
y1sp
y2sù
y3¹ke
y¹2l
y¹3le
y¹3lí
y2¹m
y¹2ò
y1¹p
y2¹¹
y1ta
y1tá
y1tì
y1th
y1tí
yt3kl.
yt3lá
yt3lí
y1tò
yt3rý
y1tu
y1tv
y1tw
y1ty
y1tz
y1»á
y1»e
y1»h
y1u
yu1a
yu1e
yu1i
yu2s
yu2v
yu3¾
y1ù
y1ü
yv2d
y3vl
y3v2s
y2vt
yvý1
y1w
y1x
y1y
y1ý
y1z
y3za
y3zá
y2zc
yz2d
yz2h
yz2j
yz3ka
y2zl
yz3lí
y3zo
yz2p
yz2v
y3zy
y1¾2
y2¾l
y2¾n
ý1b
ýb3lík
ý3chd
ý3che
ý3cu
ýè2n
ýè2t
ý1d
ýd1b
ýd2l
ý1ï
ý1ek
ýf3t
ý1h
ý2h2n
ýi1
ý1iv
ý1j2
ýj3ma
ý1k
ý2kv
ý1la
ý1lá
ý1le
ý1lé
ý1lí
ý1lo
ý1lu
ý1lý
ý1m
ý2mh
ý2mí
ý2m2¾
ý2ná
ý2ne
ý3ned
ý2nì
ý2ni
ý2ní
ý2nu
ý2nù
ý1òá
ý1òc
ý1òs
ýo1
ý1p
ýp3li
ý2pn
ýpo1
ý1ra
ý1rá
ý1rc
ý1rd
ý1re
ý1ri
ý1rl
ý1ro
ýr1s
ý1ru
ý1rù
ý1ry
ý1ø
ý1sa
ý1s3b
ý1sc
ý1si
ý1sl
ý1sm
ý1sp
ý1s2t
ý1¹a
ý¹1l
ý1¹p
ý1¹¹
ý1¹ù
ý1¹v
ý1ta
ý1tá
ý3tc
ý1tì
ý1th
ý1tí
ýt3lo
ý1tr
ý1tu
ý1ty
ý1u
ýu1k
ýu2n
ý1z2
ýz3ka
ýz3ly
ýz3nì
ýz3ní
ýz3no
ý1¾a
ý1¾á
ý1¾ù
1za1
za3br
za3c
za3dc
zae2
za3f
za3gg
za3h2
za3jc
za3jn
za3js
za3jt
za3kk
za3km
za3kn
za3ks
za3lm
za3mb
za3mc
za3md
za3mf
za3mn
za3mp
za3ms
za3mz
za3n¹
za3òk
za3p2
zas2
za3t2
za3»
za3vè
za3vn
zav3¹t
za3vt
za3z
1zä
1zá
zá3chù
zá3dr
zá1h2
zá1i
zá1í
3záp
zá3rc
zá3ri
zá3rí
zá3rv
zá1s
zá¹2
zá3ta
zá3tr
zá1z
z1bì
z3bi
z3bí
zbl2
z1bø
1z2bý
z1c
z3cc.
z3ce
z3ci
z3cv
z3cz
z1è
z2èr
2zdé
z3dh
z3di
z1dm
2zdn
2zdò
zd2p
z3drb
z3drc
z3drn
z3drt
z3dr»
z3dru
z3drù
z3drý
z3dø
zd3øí.
2zds
2zdu
zd2v
2z2dy
2zdý
2zdz
z1ïu
1ze
ze3au
ze3br
ze3ète
ze3ètu
ze3dø
ze3et
ze3h2
ze1i
ze3jdì
ze3jdi
ze3kb
ze3kl
ze3ku
ze3ml
ze3mne
ze3mnu
zen3bu
z3env
ze3p2
ze1s2
ze3¹k
ze3¹v
zet2
ze3tí
ze3tn
ze3tø
ze1u
ze3vn
ze3z
1zìj
1zéø
z2f
z3fai
z3fg
z3ft
zh2
z3há
1zhë
z2hn
z1ho
z1hý
1zi
ziè3t
zi3f
z3inf
z3int
zi3pl
z3isa
zi3ske
zi3skl
zi3slo
zi3sp
zi3stá
zi3stì
zi3str
zi3stø
ziu2
1zí
z1ja
z1já
z3jí
z3jos
zju1
z1jv
zk2
z3ka.
zk3c
2zke
z1ké
z1kg
z3kl
z3km
zk3n
zk3pl
zk3s
z3ky
z1ký
3zl.
z3la
2zlé
z3lé.
z3li
zlik3
2zlí
z3lík
zl3k
2z1lu
z3lù
2zly
2z1lý
zm2
1zmb
z3mìm
z3mì¹
z3mg
z1ml
z3mn
2zmó
z2mu
z3my
z2na
z2ná
zn2c
2zné
zni3s
2zno
z3nt
2zny
2zný
2z1ò
z2òa
1zo
z1oá
zob3r
zoe2
zo1i
zo¹1
1zó.
1zód
1zóó
1zór
z1pe
z2pì
z1pé
z2pí
z3pt
z2py
1zq
z3rado
z3rajc
3zrak
z3razi
z3razí
z3ra¾
z3rá¾
z1rý
z2ø2
zøej3
z3øe¹
z3øez
1zøì
1zøé
1zøj
1zøo
1zøu
2z1s2
z3sá
z3sc
3zsj
z3sk
zs3pod
z2ss
z3su
z3sv
2z1¹2
z2¹l
z2¹m
z2¹n
z2¹3»
2zta
z1tí
z3tp
ztros3
z3tø
1zu
3zu.
zu1a
2zud
zu1e
zu1i
zu3mì
zu3mí
zu2s
zu3sc
zu1¹
zu2v
1zù
zù2ø
zú3be
zú1è
z2úk
zú1r
z2ú1ø
zú1s
z2úz
z2ú¾
3zvam
z3ven
3zvì.
z3vi
z2vj
zv2n
z2vp
z2v¹
z2vu
z2vù
z2vv
z2vy
z2v¾
1zw
zx1s
1zy
3zy.
zyd3l
zy3el
2zyo
1zý
2zz
z3za
zz2d
z1zé
zz3lé
zz2m
zz2n
z1zr
zz2v
z1¾
1¾aè
¾a3d
¾a3jg
2¾1b
¾3ba
¾1c
¾1è
¾1d
¾d1r
¾1ïu
1¾e
¾e2b1
¾e3bi
¾e1e
¾ek2
¾e3stv
¾e3vk
¾e3zv
1¾é
1¾f
1¾h2
¾h3ne
1¾i
¾i3bv
3¾il
¾is3k
¾i3tò
1¾í
¾j2
¾2je
2¾1k
¾3ko
¾kono3
2¾l.
2¾li
1¾lo
2¾1m
¾3má
¾1n
¾1ò
¾2òa
1¾o
¾oá2
¾on2
¾1p2
1¾r
¾1ru
2¾1s2
¾1¹¹
¾¹2t
2¾1t
1¾u
¾u3ka
¾u2v
¾ú2¾
¾2v
